District of Columbia statutes.
4-1501.07

Assessment of information on covered child or youth services providers.

The Mayor shall review the information on all proposed covered child or youth services providers submitted pursuant to § 4-1501.06, and any other available information, to make a decision regarding the applicability of this chapter to each child or youth services provider.

History

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 207, 52 DCR 2331

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2(b) of (D.C. Law 16-65, March 8, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 2515).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 207 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Criminal Background Checks for the Protection of Children Clarification Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-179, October 4, 2005, 52 DCR 9079).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Criminal Background Checks for the Protection of Children Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-259, January 26, 2006, 53 DCR 777).